src/phonology/som-phon.twolc
! TODO: dukaammo
! baabuurro, dukaammo, albaabbo
! Except words like guri/bangi, which have y.
"Declension 2: -C doubling in plural"
 %{C2%}:Cz <=> :Cz PostN _ ( %{#%}:0 ) PlVowels ;
	where Cz in (b d dh l r n m)
	PlVowels in (a o á ó) ;

! TODO: This rule is currently conflicting with the next one.
! bangiyo
! TODO: guriyo, guryo
"Declension 2: -y insertion after back sounds and fricatives; and after -i"
 %{C2%}:y <=> Cz PostN _ ( %{#%}:0 ) PlVowels ; 
			  I PostN _ ( %{#%}:0 ) PlVowels ;
	where Cz in (w c q x s j %{đ%})
	PlVowels in (a o á ó) ;


! miisas, qoysas, afaf
"Declension 4: Plural Partial Reduplication"
 %{C2%}:Cz <=> Cz PostN A _ ; 
	where Cz in Cons
	matched ;

! TODO: nimanka not working 
"Declension 4: Plural Partial Reduplication %{m}"
 %{C2%}:m <=> %{m%}: PostN _ %{#%}:0 A ;

"Declension 4: C2->n in m contexts"
 %{C2%}:n <=> :m Tones %{#%}:0 %{N%}:0 A _ %{#%}:0 [ k t n ] ;
 			  :m ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 %{N%}:0 ( Vowels ) _ ;

! yar´{#}{N}{C3A}{C3B}{C3C}{#}{##}

!! "Declension 4: Plural Full Reduplication - pt. 1"
!!  %{C3A%}:Cz <=> Cz WordChars WordChars ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 %{N%}:0 _ ;
!!     matched ;

!! "Declension 4: Plural Full Reduplication - pt. 2"
!!  %{C3B%}:Cz <=> WordChars Cz WordChars ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 %{N%}:0 _ ;
!!     where Cz in Cons
!!     matched ;
!! 
!! "Declension 4: Plural Full Reduplication - pt. 3"
!!  %{C3C%}:Cz <=> WordChars WordChars Cz ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 %{N%}:0 _ ;
!!     where Cz in Cons
!!     matched ;

! guriyo
"-y- insertion in plurals"
 0:y <=> I PostN _ VowB ;
	where VowB in (a o u e á ó ú é) ;

! disallow yy
"Disallow yy"
 y:0 <=> _ [PostN | MorphBoundary] y ;


! Doesn't work with wuxu, where k has been deleted.
! Doesn't work with magicii, magucu, but should optionally. magacii and magicii, etc are both possible

! Opacity?  wax+ku -> wax+u -> wux+u

"Declension 6: final vowel"
  a:o <=> _ PostN %{##%}:0 ;
  		  _ PostN o ;


! 
"Declension V1: magacow / magacaabay / magacawday, shorten a"
 a:0 <=> a _ %{#%}:0 w d ;

"Declension V1: A deletion"
 a:0 <=> a _ %{%-VV%}:0 ;

"Delete preceding a"
 a:0 <=>  _ %{%-a%}:0 ;

! TRY: { WordChars - O }

! _ Tones MorphBoundary NOUN [WordChars - O] ; 

!!! 
!!! ! WordBoundary \?:WordChars
! TODO: could also be i/a alternations in this declension

"Declension 7: {-e} delete"
 e:0 <=> _ %{%-e%}:0 ;

"Declension 7: final vowel"
 %{e%}:a <=> _ PostN WordChars ;

"Declension 7: final vowel in final position"
 %{e%}:e <=> _ PostN %{##%}:0 ;



!!!
!!!
!!!  Verbal Rules
!!!
!!!

! {-I}:0 for derivations

"V2A -> V3B derivations, delete -i"
 i:0 <=> Vowels Cons _ %{%-I%}:0 ;

"V2A -> V3B derivations, depalatization"
 j:g <=> _ i:0 %{%-I%}:0 ;

! {-V}:0 for concatenative v deletion set.

! "V1: -w deletion"
!  w:0 <=> _ %{%-w%}:0 ;

! "V1: b mutation"
!  b:w <=> _ %{#%}:0 Cons ;


! TODO: xfst  analyzes both, generates one for tag, but not for bex
! bax+V+Inf, tag+V+Inf

"V1: a/e umlaut before i/e"
  %{ae%}:e <=> Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) [%{#%}:0 | %{#%}:0+ ] i ;
               Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) [%{#%}:0 | %{#%}:0+ ] e ;


"V1: a/e umlaut before a"
  %{ae%}:a <=> Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) [%{#%}:0 | %{#%}:0+ ] a ;
               Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) [%{#%}:0 | %{#%}:0+ ] Cons ;


! "V1: a/e umlaut before i/e"
!   %{ae%}:a <=> Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) [%{#%}:0 | %{#%}:0+ ] [ :I | :E ] ;

! TODO: maqallay
"V1, D3: Vowel deletion"
 Vz:0 <=>
          ! V1 
          ! Cons+ for korodhay, etc
          %^:0 _ Cons+ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0+ Vowels ; 
          ! D3
          %^: _ Cons PostN Vowels ; 
          ! With no %^ marker, but {-V} instead
          Cons _ Cons ( Tones ) %{%-V%}:0 %{#%}:0+ [ Vowels + 0 ] ;

	where Vz in Vowels ;

    ! maqlay			maqalnay/maqallay
    ! maqashay			maqasheen
    ! maqlay			maqleen
    ! maqashay		


    ! arkay			aragnay
    ! aragtay			aragteen
    ! arkay			arkeen
    ! aragtay		

    ! inf:     1P       2P          INF
    ! -lan    -lmay    -lantay      -lmi
    ! -dub    -dbay    -dubtay      -dbi
    ! -ran    -rmay    -rantay      -rmi
    
    ! ran{-V}{#}0 -> rm
    ! ran{-V}{#}i -> rmi
    ! ran{-V}{#}t -> rant
    
    ! TODO: seems to be optional?
    ! echo "gulaalan+V+3SgM+Ind+Past" | xsomgen
    ! -> gulaalanay, gulaalmay


! TODO: is there a better place to do this? After twolc?
"V1: Simplification of dhd to dh (t)"
 t:0 <=> d h ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 _ ;


! "V4: Vowel deletion without preceding marker before vowels and epsilon"
!  Vz:0 <=> Cons _ Cons %{%-V%}:0 %{#%}:0 [Vowels + 0] ;
!    where Vz in Vowels ;
 
"V1: n/m when deleted vowel results in C0n"
 n:m <=> Cons Vowels:0 _ ( Tones ) %{%-V%}:0 %{#%}:0+ [ Vowels + 0 ] ;


 
!!!
!!!  V2A
!!!



!!!
!!!  V2B
!!!

"V2B: y-insertion"
 0:y <=> [:Vowels - :y] ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 _ %{#%}:0 :Vowels ; 

"V2B: ey before consonants"
 %{e%}:y <=> _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 [:Cons - :Y] ; 

"V2B: ee before y"
 %{e%}:e <=> _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 :Y ; 

"V2B: Remove e"
 %{e%}:0 <=> _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 :Y :Cons ;


	 ! PAST

	 ! sameeyay		sameynay
	 ! sameysay		sameyseen / sameysid
	 ! sameeyay		sameeyeen
	 ! sameysay		

	 ! PROG

	 ! sameynayaa
	 ! etc...



!!!
!!!  V3A
!!!




!!!
!!!  V3B
!!!

!! Following rules are for the funky things that happen with 1Sg, 3SgM, 3Pl
!! Basically, disallowed d_d, so it gets simplified to t
!!   

!!	wada{#}d{#}aa{##}		wada{#}nn{#}aa{##}
!!  wada{#}t{#}aa{##}		wada{#}d{#}aan{##}
!!	wada{#}d{#}aa{##}		wada{#}t{#}aan{##}
!!  wada{#}t{#}aa{##}

!!	wataa						wadannaa
!!  wadataa						wadataan
!!	wataa						wataan
!!  wadataa


!!	fura{#}d{#}aa{##}		fura{#}nn{#}aa{##}
!!  fura{#}t{#}aa{##}		fura{#}d{#}aan{##}
!!	fura{#}d{#}aa{##}		fura{#}t{#}aan{##}
!!  fura{#}t{#}aa{##}

!!	furtaa						furannaa
!!  furataa						furataan
!!	furtaa						furtaan
!!  furataa

!! Also another type: TODO: merge

!! sigo+V+IV+1Sg+Ind+Past   sig{a}{#}d{#}ay{##}
!! sigo+V+IV+2Sg+Ind+Past   sig{a}{#}t{#}ay{##}

!! sigtay
!! sigatay

!! But: obd / cd / hd / qd / xd / yd
!! Note: bt / obd

! TODO: cashaoyin
! 					casha´´{#}{N}oyin{##}

"V3B: %{o%}:o finally"
 a:o <=> _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 %{##%}:0 ; 

"V3B: %{o%}:0 in d _ d"
 a:0 <=> Vowels CorCons: _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 d: ;
 	where CorCons in (d r s) ;

"V3B: d dissimilation"
 d:0 <=> Vowels d: a:0 ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 _ %{#%}:0 ;

! TODO: block with obd? 
"V3B: d dissimilation w/ cor" 
 d:t <=> Vowels [CorCons: - d:] [ a:0 ] ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 _ %{#%}:0 ;
         Vowels NonCorCons %{a%}:0 ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 _ ;
         Vowels s h [ a:0 %{a%}:0 ] ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 _ ;
         ! arrumo -> arruntay Nasal
         Vowels :n %{a%}:0 ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 _ ;

 	where CorCons in (d r s)
 	      NonCorCons in (b f g n q r) 
 	      ;

"V3B: d dissimilation 2" 
 d:t <=> Vowels _ a:0 ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 d:0 %{#%}:0 ; 

! TODO: buqday / buqatay ; sirtay / siratay

"V3B: root {a} deletion before suffixes with -d"
 %{a%}:0 <=> _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 d: ;

"V3B: otherwise"
 %{a%}:a <=> _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 t: ;

 
!!!
!!!
!!!  General Rules
!!!
!!!

!!!!! !!! 
!!!!! !!! "Vowel reduction VVY -> VY"
!!!!! !!!  V1:0 <=> _ WordBoundary (MorphBoundary) V1 Vowels ;
!!!!! !!!   where V1 in Vowels
!!!!! !!! 	matched ;
!!!!! !!! 

"Vowel reduction VVV -> VV"
 V1:0 <=> _ WordBoundary (MorphBoundary) V1 V1 ;
  where V1 in Vowels
	matched ;

!!!!! !!! ! Rule should only apply to VVY -> VY and VVV -> VV, not YVV -> YV or any other
!!!!! !!! ! permutations
!!!!! !!! 

! TODO: sakhraan / sakhraamo
"m->n in codas"
 Cm:n <=> _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 [ %{##%}:0 | k: | t: ] ; 
 		  _ PostN [ %{##%}:0 | k: | t: ] ;
 	! V3B 1P arrumo -> arruntay
 	      _ %{a%}:0 ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 d: ;
 	      ! Before clitics
 	      _ PostN %{#%}:0 [ Cons: - [ k: | g: ] ] ;
 	where Cm in (m %{m%}) ;

"m->m in codas"
 %{m%}:m <=> _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 ( %{N%}:0 ) [ Vowels | :m ] ; 
 		  _ PostN :m ;

"Optional m doubling"
 0:m => _ %{m%}:m ;

! magac%{áa%}%{#%}%{N%}ku%{##%} 
"Velar deletion after Back, but avoiding digraphs"
 k:0 <=> [Letters - [d | s | k ]] Back PostN _ ;

! Final lenition appears to be final voicing because of the orthography.
! {b d g} represent lenis stops, and {p t k} represent fortis stops.
! Lenition occurs in syllable codas, leading to alternations 
! such as arkaa / aragtaa

! Some literature may refer to this as final voicing.

! TODO: xfst generating two forms, only want one: arag+V+2Sg+Ind+Pres

"Final lenition."
 Cv:Cx <=> Vowels _ ( Tones ) %{#%}:0 ( %{N%}:0 ) [ %{##%}:0 | :Cons ] ;
  where Cx in (b d g)
        Cv in (p t k)
		matched ; 

"-ee changes to -ye after other vowels"
 %{E%}:y <=> [Vowels - o] %{#%}:0 _ e ;

"-ee changes to -e after y"
 %{E%}:0 <=> y %{#%}:0 _ e ;

"-ee clitic deletes preceding -o"
 Cv:0 <=> _ %{#%}:0 %{E%}:e ;
  where Cv in ( o ) ;

! dhammaan
"progressive nasal assimilation across morphological boundaries"
 n:m <=> m %{#%}:0 _ ;

!!!
!!!
!!!  Tonal stuff
!!!
!!!


!!!!! !!! !!!!
!!!!! !!! !!
!!!!! !!! !! ATR Harmony / Vowel Harmony
!!!!! !!! !!
!!!!! !!! !!!!!!
!!!!! !!! 
!!!!! !!! ! WordInternal is a mix of derivational tags, Dummies and WordChars.
!!!!! !!! ! See above...
!!!!! !!! 
!!!!! !!! ! Goal for these rules:
!!!!! !!! 
!!!!! !!! ! GENERATION:
!!!!! !!! !   Generate +ATR if possible, otherwise also generate -ATR
!!!!! !!! !   	doon+V+etc -> döönää, doonaa
!!!!! !!! !		jab+V+etc  -> jabaa
!!!!! !!! !
!!!!! !!! ! ANALYSIS:
!!!!! !!! !   If a word is +ATR, accept -ATR input
!!!!! !!! !   Do not accept +ATR word if a word is not +ATR
!!!!! !!! !
!!!!! !!! !		jäbää -> *
!!!!! !!! ! 		jabaa -> jab+V+etc
!!!!! !!! !		jabayay -> jab+V+Prog+etc
!!!!! !!! !		jäbäyäy -> jab+V+Prog+etc
!!!!! !!! !
!!!!! !!! !		(Progressive seems to have ATR all the time)
!!!!! !!! 
!!!!! !!! ! TODO: ATR - blocks a lot of weird paths
!!!!! !!! !!!!! "ATR"
!!!!! !!! !!!!!   Vb:Vf => %{ATR%}:0 [WordInternal]+ _ ;
!!!!! !!! !!!!! 			 FrontV [WordInternal]+ _ ;
!!!!! !!! !!!!! 			_ ( [WordInternal]+ ) FrontV ;
!!!!! !!! !!!!! 			_ ( [WordInternal]+ ) %{ATR%}:0 ;
!!!!! !!! !!!!! 
!!!!! !!! !!!!!  	where Vf in FrontV
!!!!! !!! !!!!!  		  Vb in BackV
!!!!! !!! !!!!! 	matched ;
!!!!! !!! !!!!! 
!!!!! !!! !!!!! 
!!!!! !!! !!!!! "VH must match"
!!!!! !!! !!!!!  Vb:Vb <=> _ ([WordInternal]+) Vb ;
!!!!! !!! !!!!! 		  Vb ([WordInternal]+) _ ;
!!!!! !!! !!!!!    where Vb in BackV ;
!!!!! !!! 
!!!!! !!! ! TODO: Fix these
!!!!! !!! ! doondoon+V+Prog+1Sg+Ind+Pres	doondoonayaa
!!!!! !!! ! doondoon+V+Prog+1Sg+Ind+Pres	doondoonäyää
!!!!! !!! ! doondoon+V+Prog+1Sg+Ind+Pres	dööndöönayaa
!!!!! !!! ! doondoon+V+Prog+1Sg+Ind+Pres	dööndöönäyää
!!!!! !!! 
!!!!! !!! ! TODO: Cases to consider
!!!!! !!! ! 
!!!!! !!! ! ninkïï - clitic Boundary
!!!!! !!! ! bërbëruu - clitic Boundary
!!!!! !!! 
!!!!! !!! 
!!!!! !!! !! "Remove ATR"
!!!!! !!! !!  Tx:Ty <=> _ ;
!!!!! !!! !! 	where Tx in (ä ë ï ö ü)
!!!!! !!! !! 		  Ty in (a e i o u)
!!!!! !!! !! 	matched ;
!!!!! !!! 

!!! "Remove dummies"
!!!  Dummy:0 <=> _ ;

! vim modeline
! vim: set ts=4 sw=4 tw=0 syntax=lexc :


!€ primus%>s
!€ primus00

!€grís%>s
!€grís00

!$grís%>s
!$grís0s
